Utah statutes.
54-17-301.   Review of integrated resource plan action plans.

(1)  An affected electrical utility shall file with the commission any action plan developed as part of the affected electrical utility's integrated resource plan to enable the commission to review and provide guidance to the affected electrical utility.

(2) (a)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the commission shall make rules providing a process for its review of an action plan.

(b)  The rules required under Subsection (2)(a) shall provide sufficient flexibility to permit changes in an action plan between the periodic filings of the affected electrical utility's integrated resource plan.

